Nebraska, session 109, LB98.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 60-103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-103 All-terrain vehicle means any motorized off-highway device which
(1) is fifty inches or less in width, (2) has a dry weight of twelve hundred
pounds or less, (3) travels on three or more nonhighway tires, and (3) (4) is
designed for operator use only with no passengers or is specifically designed
by the original manufacturer for the operator and one passenger.
Sec. 2. Section 60-135.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-135.01 (1) Utility-type vehicle means any motorized off-highway device
which (a) is seventy-four inches in width or less, (b) is not more than one
hundred eighty inches, including the bumper, in length, and (c) has a dry
weight of two thousand pounds or less, and (d) travels on four or more
nonhighway tires.
(2) Utility-type vehicle does not include all-terrain vehicles, golf car
vehicles, or low-speed vehicles.
Sec. 3. Section 60-305, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-305 All-terrain vehicle means any motorized off-highway vehicle which
(1) is fifty inches or less in width, (2) has a dry weight of twelve hundred
pounds or less, (3) travels on three or more nonhighway tires, and (3) (4) is
designed for operator use only with no passengers or is specifically designed
by the original manufacturer for the operator and one passenger. All-terrain
vehicles which have been modified or retrofitted with after-market parts to
include additional equipment not required by sections 60-6,357 and 60-6,358
shall not be registered under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, nor shall
such modified or retrofitted vehicles be eligible for registration in any other
category of vehicle defined in the act.
Sec. 4. Section 60-358.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-358.01 (1) Utility-type vehicle means any motorized off-highway vehicle
which (a) is seventy-four inches in width or less, (b) is not more than one
hundred eighty inches, including the bumper, in length, and (c) has a dry
weight of two thousand pounds or less, and (d) travels on four or more
nonhighway tires. Utility-type vehicles which have been modified or retrofitted
with after-market parts to include additional equipment not required by
sections 60-6,357 and 60-6,358 shall not be registered under the Motor Vehicle
Registration Act, nor shall such modified or retrofitted vehicles be eligible
for registration in any other category of vehicle defined in the act.
(2) Utility-type vehicle does not include all-terrain vehicles, golf car
vehicles, or low-speed vehicles.
Sec. 5. Section 60-6,355, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
60-6,355 (1) For purposes of sections 60-6,355 to 60-6,362:
(a) All-terrain vehicle means any motorized off-highway vehicle which (i)
is fifty inches or less in width, (ii) has a dry weight of twelve hundred
pounds or less, (iii) travels on three or more nonhighway tires, and (iii) (iv)
is designed for operator use only with no passengers or is specifically
designed by the original manufacturer for the operator and one passenger.
(b)(i) Utility-type vehicle means any motorized off-highway vehicle which
(A) is seventy-four inches in width or less, (B) is not more than one hundred
eighty inches, including the bumper, in length, and (C) has a dry weight of two
thousand pounds or less, (D) travels on four or more nonhighway tires.
(ii) Utility-type vehicle does not include all-terrain vehicles, golf car
vehicles, or low-speed vehicles.
(2) All-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles which have been
modified or retrofitted with after-market parts to include additional equipment
not required by sections 60-6,357 and 60-6,358 shall not be registered under
the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, nor shall such modified or retrofitted
vehicles be eligible for registration in any other category of vehicle defined
in the act.
Sec. 6. Original sections 60-103, 60-135.01, 60-305, 60-358.01, and
60-6,355, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 7. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-